Utah statutes.
78A-2-403.   Appointment of reporters -- Eligibility -- Oath -- Bond -- Action on bond.

(1)  A person may not be appointed to the position of court reporter nor act in the capacity of a court reporter in any court of record of this state, or before any referee, master, board, or commission of this state without a currently valid license from the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing as provided in Title 58, Chapter 74, Certified Court Reporters Licensing Act.

(2)  Before any person may act as a court reporter, the person shall:

(a)  take, subscribe, and file the constitutional oath; and

(b)  give a bond with sufficient surety, conditioned upon the faithful performance of all duties, in the sum of $2,500, or larger sum if ordered by the judge.

(3)  The bond shall run to the state of Utah, but an action on it may be maintained by any person whose rights are affected by the failure of the reporter to perform the reporter's official duties.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

